Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska57-910.12
Unit or cooperative development; certified order of commission; recording; effect as notice.

A certified copy of any order of the commission entered under any provisions of sections 57-910 to 57-910.12 shall be entitled to be recorded in the office of the register of deeds for the counties where all or any portion of the unit area is located, and such recordation shall constitute notice thereof to all persons.

Laws 1965, c. 343, § 13, p. 981.